en: Interface type: Audio output; Bluetooth; MIDI; USB; Other
ru: Тип интерфейса: Аудиовыход; Bluetooth; MIDI; USB; Другой
ja: インターフェースの種類: オーディオ出力; Bluetooth; ミディ; USB; その他
pl: Typ interfejsu: Wyjście audio; Bluetooth; MIDI; USB; Inne
de: Schnittstellentyp: Audioausgang; Bluetooth; Midi; USB; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Тип интерфейс: Аудио изход; Bluetooth; MIDI; USB; Други
lt-LT: Sąsajos tipas: Garso išvestis; „Bluetooth“; MIDI; USB; Kita
nb: Grensesnitttype: Lydutgangsformat; Bluetooth; Midi; USB; Annet
tr: Arayüz türü: Ses çıkışı; Bluetooth; Midi; USB; Diğer
zh-TW: 介面類型: 音訊輸出; 藍牙; 中長裙; USB; 其他
el: Τύπος διεπαφής: Έξοδος ήχου; Bluetooth; MIDI; USB; Άλλο
fi: Käyttöliittymätyyppi: Audiolähtö; Bluetooth; Midi; USB; Muu
hr-HR: Vrsta sučelja: Audioizlaz; Bluetooth; MIDI; USB; Ostalo
sk-SK: Typ rozhrania: Zvukový výstup; Bluetooth; MIDI; USB; Iné
vi: Loại giao diện: Đầu ra âm thanh; Bluetooth; Ngang hoặc qua đầu gối; USB; Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de interface: Saída de áudio; Bluetooth; Midi; USB; Outro
da: Grænsefladetype: Lydudgang; Bluetooth; Midi; USB; Andet
pt-BR: Tipo de interface: Saída de áudio; Bluetooth; Midi; USB; Outro
it: Tipo di interfaccia: Uscita audio; Bluetooth; MIDI; USB; Altro
ko: 인터페이스 유형: 오디오 출력; Bluetooth; 미디; USB; 기타
zh-CN: 接口类型: 音频输出; 蓝牙; 及膝; USB; 其他
th: ประเภทอินเทอร์เฟซ: เอาต์พุตเสียง; บลูทูธ; MIDI; USB; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta vmesnika: Avdio izhod; Bluetooth; MIDI; USB; Drugo
nl: Type interface: Audio-uitgang; Bluetooth; Midi; USB; Andere
es: Tipo de interfaz: Salida de audio; Bluetooth; Midi; USB; Otros
cs: Typ rozhraní: Audiovýstup; Bluetooth; Midi; USB; Jiné
sv: Gränssnittstyp: Ljudutgångar; Bluetooth; Midi; USB; Övrigt
ro-RO: Tip interfață: Ieșire audio; Bluetooth; MIDI; USB; Altele
hu: Interfész típusa: Audiokimenet; Bluetooth; MIDI; USB; Egyéb
fr: Type d’interface: Sortie audio; Bluetooth; Midi; USB; Autre